Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE M. DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES

CHAPTER 1004. PUBLIC ACCESS

Sec. 1004.001. ACCESS TO PROGRAMS AND FACILITIES. (a) The department shall prepare and maintain a written plan that describes how a person who does not speak English may be provided reasonable access to the department's programs.

(b) The department shall comply with federal and state laws for program and facility accessibility.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1004.002. PUBLIC COMMENT. The board and the department shall develop and implement policies that provide the public with a reasonable opportunity to appear before the board or the department and to speak on any issue under the jurisdiction of the board or the department.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1004.003. CONFIDENTIALITY OF INFORMATION RELATED TO INVESTIGATIONS. Information obtained during an investigation of a person regulated under Chapter 2301 or 2302, Occupations Code, or Chapter 503 or 643 of this code is confidential and not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, until the investigation is dismissed or finally resolved only if the disclosure of that information would interfere with or jeopardize the investigation.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (S.B. 604), Sec. 1.07, eff. September 1, 2019.